Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1830.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 4572.1 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:SECTION 1. SECTIONS 4572.1 AND 4573(A) OF TITLE 75 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES ARE AMENDED TO READ:§ 4572.1. Flashing or revolving lights on tow trucks.(a) Colored lights.--(1) Subject to subsection (b), [tow trucks] a tow truck may be equipped with one or more flashing or revolving yellow lights and one or more flashing or revolving white lights. The manner in which the light or lights [shall be] are displayed shall be determined by regulation of the department.<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718 (2) [Subject to subsection (b.1), tow trucks] A tow truck may be equipped with one or more flashing or revolving yellow lights [and]. Subject to subsection (b.1), a tow truck or emergency roadside service vehicle may be equipped with one or more flashing or revolving blue lights. The blue lights [shall] may only be equipped in the rear of the vehicle.(b) Limitations on white lights.--The flashing or revolving yellow and white lights under subsection (a)(1) on [tow trucks shall] a tow truck may be activated only when the vehicle is actively performing the type of work which is the basis of the designation of the vehicle as an authorized vehicle or is within the vicinity of an emergency response area. [Tow trucks shall not operate] A tow truck may not be operated with activated flashing or revolving yellow and white lights under subsection (a)(1) when:(1) Not engaged in the act of towing a vehicle.(2) Brake lights, turn signals and operating lights are visible from the rear and not obstructed.(3) The vehicle being towed does not trail behind the tow truck and is securely positioned on the flatbed of the tow truck with no parts of the towed vehicle overhanging.(b.1) Limitations on blue lights.--A tow truck or emergency roadside service vehicle may only [operate] be operated with blue lights under subsection (a)(2) while the [tow truck] OR EMERGENCY ROADSIDE SERVICE vehicle is stationary on the side of the road or highway [while] and responding to a disabled vehicle. A tow truck [shall not operate] or emergency roadside service vehicle may not be operated with blue lights under subsection (a)(2) at any time while the [tow truck] OR EMERGENCY 20250HB1830PN3052 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ROADSIDE SERVICE vehicle is in motion.(c) Penalty.--Unauthorized use of the lights specified in this [subsection] section shall be a summary offense punishable by a fine of $50.(d) Definition.--As used in this section, the term "emergency roadside service vehicle" means a vehicle used to assist or service a disabled vehicle in any of the following activities, excluding transport of the disabled vehicle:(1) tire change;(2) lockout assistance;(3) fuel delivery;(4) battery jump start;(5) vehicle extraction; or(6) minor mechanical servicing at or near the vicinity of the disabled vehicle.(D) DEFINITION.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE TERM "EMERGENCY ROADSIDE SERVICE VEHICLE" MEANS A VEHICLE, OTHER THAN A TOW TRUCK, THAT IS:(1) OWNED AND OPERATED BY A:(I) TOW TRUCK OPERATOR AS DEFINED IN SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF JULY 5, 2012 (P.L.990, NO.110), KNOWN AS THE TOWING AND TOWING STORAGE FACILITY STANDARDS ACT; OR(II) NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED NONPROFIT OR NOT-FOR-PROFIT CLUB OR ASSOCIATION PROVIDING MOTOR VEHICLE ASSISTANCE OR SERVICES TO ITS MEMBERS; AND(2) MARKED IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 4573 (RELATING TO IDENTIFICATION OF CERTAIN VEHICLES) WHILE BEING USED TO ASSIST OR SERVICE A DISABLED VEHICLE IN ANY OF THE FOLLOWING ACTIVITIES, EXCLUDING TRANSPORT OF THE DISABLED VEHICLE:(I) TIRE CHANGE;20250HB1830PN3052 - 3 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (II) LOCKOUT ASSISTANCE;(III) FUEL DELIVERY;(IV) BATTERY JUMP START OR REPLACEMENT OF BATTERY;(V) VEHICLE EXTRACTION; OR(VI) MINOR MECHANICAL SERVICING AT OR NEAR THE VICINITY OF THE DISABLED VEHICLE.§ 4573. IDENTIFICATION OF CERTAIN VEHICLES.(A) COMMERCIAL TOW TRUCKS AND EMERGENCY ROADSIDE SERVICE VEHICLES.--(1) ANY TRUCK WHICH IS USED COMMERCIALLY TO TOW OTHER MOTOR VEHICLES SHALL HAVE THE NAME OF THE BUSINESS, OR PERSON, OPERATING THE TRUCK DISPLAYED ON SIGNS ON BOTH SIDES OF THE TRUCK.(2) ANY EMERGENCY ROADSIDE SERVICE VEHICLE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 4572.1(D) (RELATING TO FLASHING OR REVOLVING LIGHTS ON TOW TRUCKS), SHALL HAVE THE NAME OF THE BUSINESS OR PERSON OPERATING THE TOW TRUCK DISPLAYED ON SIGNS ON BOTH SIDES OF THE EMERGENCY ROADSIDE SERVICE VEHICLE.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1830PN3052 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617181920